District of Columbia statutes.
10-551.06

Green building priority.

Priority consideration for the District government’s facility needs shall be given to buildings fulfilling or exceeding the LEED-NC 2.2 standard or the LEED-CS 2.0 standard at the silver level. For purposes of this subsection, the terms “LEED-CS” and “LEED-NC” shall have the same meanings as provided in § 6-1451.01(28) and (30), respectively.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1027, 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1007 of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).